Hawaii statutes.
[§28-8.5] Special assistant to the attorney
general; appointment and duties; secretary. The attorney general may
appoint, and at the attorney general's pleasure dismiss, a special assistant to
the attorney general who shall generally assist the attorney general, as the
attorney general may require, in the initiation, direction, or monitoring of
administrative or managerial special projects that the attorney general has
determined to be necessary. In addition, the special assistant shall, as the
attorney general may direct, serve as the attorney general's representative to,
and monitor and apprise the attorney general of the activities of, the various
national, regional, state, and local organizations and committees in which the
attorney general has membership, participation, or interest. The special
assistant to the attorney general shall be appointed without regard to chapter
76, need not be an attorney, and shall hold no other public or private office
or employment. Section 26-53 shall not be applicable to the special assistant
to the attorney general. The attorney general may also appoint, without regard
to chapter 76, one secretary for the special assistant to the attorney general.
[L 1989, c 82, §1; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next